Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 6 County and Municipal Probation

Cross references.

Payments into the Georgia Crime Victims Emergency Fund, T. 17, C. 15.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a)
The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)
The authorization for county and municipal probation offices and private probation services was enacted to provide cost savings to the state by using state probation services for felony offenders and utilizing county and municipal probation offices and private probation entities which contract with courts for the supervision of misdemeanor and county and city ordinance offenders;

“(2)
In enacting such legislation, the General Assembly intended to authorize judges to use county and municipal probation offices and private probation services providers to supervise misdemeanor and county and city ordinance offenders in the same manner as the judges of the superior courts use state probation services as a means of supervising felony offenders;

“(3)
The General Assembly did not intend to restrict the powers of judges to impose, suspend, toll, revoke, or otherwise manage the probation of misdemeanor and county and city ordinance offenders sentenced in such courts when utilizing county and municipal probation offices and private probation services providers; and

“(4)
The General Assembly intended that county and municipal probation officers and private probation officers, when acting in performance of their official duties in supervising probationers in accordance with law and the orders of a court, would have the same rights, authority, and protections as state probation supervisors.

“(b)
It is the intention of the General Assembly to improve the use and provision of probation services by courts for misdemeanor and ordinance violations by enacting this part.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 159 (2014).

42-8-100.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Supervision.

“DCS” means the Department of Community Supervision.

“Private probation officer” means an individual employed by a private corporation, private enterprise, private agency, or other private entity to supervise defendants placed on probation by a court for committing an ordinance violation or misdemeanor.

“Probation officer” means an individual employed by a governing authority of a county, municipality, or consolidated government to supervise defendants placed on probation by a court for committing an ordinance violation or misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-1/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added paragraph (2) and redesignated former paragraphs (2) and (3) as present paragraphs (3) and (4), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-101.
Agreements for probation services; termination of contract for probation services.

Upon the request of the chief judge of any court within a county and with the express written consent of such judge, the governing authority of such county shall be authorized to enter into written contracts with corporations, enterprises, or agencies to provide probation supervision, counseling, collection services for all moneys to be paid by a defendant according to the terms of the sentence imposed on the defendant as well as any moneys which by operation of law are to be paid by the defendant in consequence of the conviction, and other probation services for persons convicted in such court and placed on probation in such county. In no case shall a private probation corporation or enterprise be charged with the responsibility for supervising a felony sentence. The final contract negotiated by the governing authority of the county with the private probation entity shall be attached to the approval by the governing authority of the county to privatize probation services as an exhibit thereto. The termination of a contract for probation services as provided for in this subsection may be initiated by the chief judge of the court which is subject to such contract and shall be subject to approval by the governing authority of the county which entered into the contract and in accordance with the agreed upon, written provisions of such contract.

Upon the request of the chief judge of any court within a county and with the express written consent of such judge, the governing authority of such county shall be authorized to establish a county probation system to provide probation supervision, counseling, collection services for all moneys to be paid by a defendant according to the terms of the sentence imposed on the defendant as well as any moneys which by operation of law are to be paid by the defendant in consequence of the conviction, and other probation services for persons convicted in such court and placed on probation in such county.

Upon the request of the judge of the municipal court of any municipality or consolidated government of a municipality and county of this state and with the express written consent of such judge, the governing authority of such municipality or consolidated government shall be authorized to enter into written contracts with private corporations, enterprises, or agencies to provide probation supervision, counseling, collection services for all moneys to be paid by a defendant according to the terms of the sentence imposed on the defendant as well as any moneys which by operation of law are to be paid by the defendant in consequence of the conviction, and other probation services for persons convicted in such court and placed on probation. The final contract negotiated by the governing authority of the municipality or consolidated government with the private probation entity shall be attached to the approval by the governing authority of the municipality or consolidated government to privatize probation services as an exhibit thereto. The termination of a contract for probation services as provided for in this subsection may be initiated by the chief judge of the court which is subject to such contract and shall be subject to approval by the governing authority of the municipality or consolidated government which entered into the contract and in accordance with the agreed upon, written provisions of such contract.

Upon the request of the judge of the municipal court of any municipality or consolidated government of a municipality and county of this state and with the express written consent of such judge, the governing authority of such municipality or consolidated government shall be authorized to establish a probation system to provide probation supervision, counseling, collection services for all moneys to be paid by a defendant according to the terms of the sentence imposed on the defendant as well as any moneys which by operation of law are to be paid by the defendant in consequence of the conviction, and other probation services for persons convicted in such court and placed on probation.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1135, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1107, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1554, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 813, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-101

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-2/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former subsections (g) and (h) of Code Section 42-8-100 as present subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 42-8-101; and rewrote the section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

For note, “Safe Haven No Longer: The Role of Georgia Courts and Private Probation Companies in Sustaining a De Facto Debtors’ Prison System,” see 48 Ga. L. Rev. 227 (2013).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 159 (2014).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-102.
Probation and supervision; determination of fees, fines, and restitution; converting moneys owed to community service or educational advancement; continuing jurisdiction; revocation; transfer.

Any court which has original jurisdiction of ordinance violations or misdemeanors and in which the defendant in such a case has been found guilty upon verdict or has pled guilty or nolo contendere may, at a time to be determined by the court, hear and determine the question of the probation of such defendant.

If it appears to the court upon a hearing of the matter that the defendant is not likely to engage in an unlawful course of conduct and that the ends of justice and the welfare of society do not require that the defendant shall presently suffer the penalty imposed by law, the court in its discretion may place the defendant on probation under the supervision and control of a probation officer or private probation officer for all or a portion of the sentence or may impose a sentence upon the defendant but stay and suspend the execution of such sentence or any portion thereof. The period of probation or suspension shall not exceed the maximum sentence of confinement which could be imposed on the defendant; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the ability of a court to toll a sentence as provided in this article.

The court may, in its discretion, require the payment of a fine, fees, or restitution as a condition of probation. The provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 17 shall control in determining the amount of restitution. When probation supervision is required, the court may require the payment of a probation supervision fee as a condition of probation. In determining the financial obligations, other than restitution, to impose on the defendant, the court may consider:

The defendant’s financial resources and other assets, including whether any such asset is jointly controlled;

The defendant’s earnings and other income;

The defendant’s financial obligations, including obligations to dependents;

The period of time during which the probation order will be in effect;

The goal of the punishment being imposed; and

Any other factor the court deems appropriate.

The court may convert fines, statutory surcharges, and probation supervision fees to community service or educational advancement on the same basis as it allows a defendant to pay a fine through community service or educational advancement as set forth in subsection (d) of Code Section 17-10-1.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Developmental disability” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 37-1-1.

“Indigent” means an individual who earns less than 100 percent of the federal poverty guidelines unless there is evidence that the individual has other resources that might reasonably be used without undue hardship for such individual or his or her dependents.

“Significant financial hardship” means a reasonable probability that an individual will be unable to satisfy his or her financial obligations for two or more consecutive months.

“Totally and permanently disabled” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 49-4-80.

The court shall waive, modify, or convert fines, statutory surcharges, probation supervision fees, and any other moneys assessed by the court or a provider of probation services upon a determination by the court prior to or subsequent to sentencing that a defendant has a significant financial hardship or inability to pay or that there are any other extenuating factors which prohibit payment or collection; provided, however, that the imposition of sanctions for failure to pay such sums shall be within the discretion of the court through judicial process or hearings.

Unless rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that a defendant will be able to satisfy his or her financial obligations without undue hardship to the defendant or his or her dependents, a defendant shall be presumed to have a significant financial hardship if he or she:

Has a developmental disability;

Is totally and permanently disabled;

Is indigent; or

Has been released from confinement within the preceding 12 months and was incarcerated for more than 30 days before his or her release.

The sentencing judge shall not lose jurisdiction over any person placed on probation during the term of his or her probated sentence. As further set forth in this subsection, the judge may revoke any or all of the probated sentence, rescind any or all of the sentence, or, in any manner deemed advisable by the judge, modify or change the probated sentence, including tolling the sentence as provided in this article, at any time during the period of time originally prescribed for the probated sentence to run.

When the sole basis for a probation revocation is for failure to pay fines, statutory surcharges, or probation supervision fees, the probationer shall be scheduled to appear on the court’s next available court calendar for a hearing on such issue. No prehearing arrest warrant shall be issued under such circumstances. Absent a waiver, the court shall not revoke a probationary sentence for failure to pay fines, statutory surcharges, or probation supervision fees without holding a hearing, inquiring into the reasons for the probationer’s failure to pay, and, if a probationary sentence is revoked, making an express written determination that the probationer has not made sufficient bona fide efforts to pay and the probationer’s failure to pay was willful or that adequate alternative types of punishment do not exist. Should the probationer fail to appear at such hearing, the court may, in its discretion, revoke the probated sentence.

A person otherwise found eligible to have his or her probation modified or terminated pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not be deemed ineligible for modification or termination of probation solely due to his or her failure to pay fines, statutory surcharges, or probation supervision fees.

When the sole basis for a probation revocation is for failure to report as directed by his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, such officer shall prepare an affidavit for the court, averring, at a minimum, that:

The probationer has failed to report to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, on at least two occasions;

The officer has attempted to contact the probationer at least two times by telephone or email at the probationer’s last known telephone number or email address, which information shall be listed in the affidavit;

The officer has checked the local jail rosters and determined that the probationer is not incarcerated;

The officer has sent a letter by first-class mail to the probationer’s last known address, which shall be listed in the affidavit, advising the probationer that the officer will seek to have the probationer arrested and have his or her probation revoked if the probationer does not report to such officer in person within ten days of the date on which the letter was mailed; and

The probationer has failed to report to the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, as directed in the letter set forth in division (iv) of this subparagraph and ten days have passed since the date on which the letter was mailed.

In the event the probationer reports to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, within the period prescribed in division (iv) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the probationer may be scheduled to appear on the next available court calendar for a hearing to consider whether the probation sentence should be revoked in whole or in part.

A probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall submit the affidavit required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph together with his or her request for an arrest warrant, and the court may, in its discretion, issue a warrant for the arrest of the probationer.

At any revocation hearing, upon proof that the probationer has violated probation:

For failure to report to probation or failure to pay fines, statutory surcharges, or probation supervision fees, the court shall consider the use of alternatives to confinement, including community service, modification of the terms of probation, or any other alternative deemed appropriate by the court. The court shall consider whether a failure to pay court imposed financial obligations was willful. In the event an alternative is not warranted, the court shall revoke the balance of probation or a period not to exceed 120 days in confinement, whichever is less; and

For failure to comply with any other general provision of probation or suspension, the court shall consider the use of alternatives to confinement, including community service or any other alternative deemed appropriate by the court. In the event an alternative is not warranted, the court shall revoke the balance of probation or a period not to exceed two years in confinement, whichever is less.

If a defendant is placed on probation pursuant to this Code section by a court other than one for the county or municipality in which he or she resides for committing any ordinance violation or misdemeanor, such defendant may, when specifically ordered by the court, have his or her probation supervision transferred to the county or municipality in which he or she resides.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-3/SB 367; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-16/SB 407; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 42/HB 497.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added the subparagraph (f)(2)(A) designation; added the first two sentences in subparagraph (f)(2)(A); redesignated former paragraph (f)(3) as present subparagraph (f)(2)(B); and added paragraph (f)(3).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, inserted “or educational advancement” twice in subsection (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “email” for “e-mail” twice in division (f)(3)(A)(ii).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-102 as present Code Section 42-8-107.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-103.
Pay-only probation; discharge or termination of probation.

As used in this Code section, the term “pay-only probation” means a defendant has been placed under probation supervision solely because such defendant is unable to pay the court imposed fines and statutory surcharges when such defendant’s sentence is imposed. Such term shall not include circumstances when restitution has been imposed or other probation services are deemed appropriate by the court.

When pay-only probation is imposed, the total maximum fee collected shall be capped so as not to exceed three months of ordinary probation supervision fees at a monthly rate not to exceed the rate set forth in the contract between the court and the provider of services, notwithstanding the number of cases for which a fine and statutory surcharge were imposed or that the defendant was sentenced to serve consecutive sentences; provided, however, that collection of such fee shall terminate as soon as all court imposed fines and statutory surcharges are paid in full; and provided, further, that when all such fines and statutory surcharges are paid in full, the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall submit an order to the court terminating the probated sentence within 30 days of fulfillment of such conditions. Within 90 days of receiving such order, the court shall issue an order terminating such probated sentence or issue an order stating why such probated sentence shall continue.

If pay-only probation is subsequently converted to a sentence that requires community service, on petition by a probation officer or private probation officer and with the probationer having an opportunity for a hearing, the court may reinstate probation supervision fees as necessary to monitor the probationer’s compliance with community service obligations.

When a defendant is serving pay-only probation, upon motion by the defendant, the court may discharge such defendant from further supervision or otherwise terminate probation when it is satisfied that its action would be in the best interest of justice and the welfare of society.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-4/SB 367; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-17/SB 407.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (b), added the proviso at the end of the first sentence and added the last sentence, and, added subsection (d).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “total maximum fee collected” for “probation supervision fees” near the beginning, inserted “at a monthly rate not to exceed the rate set forth in the contract between the court and the provider of services,” near the middle, and substituted “such” for “any probation supervision” in the middle, and substituted “Within 90 days of receiving such order, the court shall issue an order terminating” for “The court shall terminate” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-103 as present Code Section 42-8-108.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

42-8-103.1.
Serving consecutive misdemeanor sentences.

When a defendant is serving consecutive misdemeanor sentences, whether as a result of one case from one jurisdiction or multiple cases from multiple jurisdictions, upon motion by the defendant, the court may discharge such defendant from further supervision or otherwise terminate probation when it is satisfied that its action would be in the best interest of justice and the welfare of society. Such motion shall not be ripe until 12 months after the sentence was entered and every four months thereafter. The defendant shall serve the applicable entity or governing authority that is providing his or her probation services with a copy of such motion.

When a defendant is serving consecutive misdemeanor sentences, his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall review such case after 12 consecutive months of probation supervision wherein the defendant has paid in full all court imposed fines, statutory surcharges, and restitution and has otherwise completed all testing, evaluations, and rehabilitative treatment programs ordered by the court to determine if such officer recommends early termination of probation. Each such case shall be reviewed every four months thereafter for the same determination until the termination, expiration, or other disposition of the case. If such officer recommends early termination, he or she shall immediately submit an order to the court to effectuate such purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-103.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-5/SB 367.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 enactment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-104.
Terms and conditions of probation.

A court which utilizes the services of a probation officer or private probation officer shall determine the terms and conditions of probation under this article and may provide such terms and conditions of probation as the court deems appropriate, including, but not limited to, providing that the probationer shall:

Avoid injurious and vicious habits;

Avoid persons or places of disreputable or harmful character;

Report to the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, as directed;

Permit the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, to visit the probationer at the probationer’s home or elsewhere;

Work faithfully at suitable employment insofar as may be possible;

Remain within a specified location; provided, however, that the court shall not banish a probationer to any area within this state:

That does not consist of at least one entire judicial circuit as described by Code Section 15-6-1; or

In which any service or program in which the probationer must participate as a condition of probation is not available;

Make reparation or restitution to any aggrieved person for the damage or loss caused by the probationer’s offense, in an amount to be determined by the court in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 14 of Title 17. Unless otherwise provided by law, no reparation or restitution to any aggrieved person for the damage or loss caused by the probationer’s offense shall be made if the amount is in dispute unless the same has been determined as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 14 of Title 17;

Make reparation or restitution as reimbursement to a municipality or county for the payment for medical care furnished to the person while incarcerated pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 4 of this title. No reparation or restitution to a local governmental unit for the provision of medical care shall be made if the amount is in dispute unless the same has been determined as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 14 of Title 17;

Repay the costs incurred by any municipality or county for wrongful actions by an inmate covered under the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 42-4-71;

Support the probationer’s legal dependents to the best of the probationer’s ability;

Violate no local, state, or federal laws and be of general good behavior;

If permitted to move or travel to another state, agree to waive extradition from any jurisdiction where the probationer may be found and not contest any effort by any jurisdiction to return the probationer to this state;

Submit to evaluations and testing relating to rehabilitation and participate in and successfully complete rehabilitative programming as directed by the court, including periodic screening for drugs and alcohol as ordered by the court and mental health evaluations as ordered by the court. The court may assess and the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall be authorized to collect the costs or a portion of the costs, as determined by the court, of such evaluations, testing, rehabilitation programs, and screenings from the probationer;

Wear a device capable of tracking the location of the probationer by means including electronic surveillance or global positioning satellite systems. The court may assess and the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall collect fees from the probationer for such monitoring at a rate not to exceed the rate set forth in the contract between the court and the provider of services;

Wear a device capable of detecting drug or alcohol use by the probationer. The court may assess and the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall collect fees from the probationer for such monitoring at a rate not to exceed the rate set forth in the contract between the court and the provider of services; and

Complete a residential or nonresidential program for substance abuse or mental health treatment as indicated by a risk and needs assessment for which the court may assess, and the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, shall be authorized to collect the costs of or a portion of the costs, as determined by the court, of such program from the probationer.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as prohibiting a court in appropriate circumstances from imposing additional special conditions of probation unless otherwise prohibited by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-104 as present Code Section 42-8-109.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-105.
Probationer obligation to keep officer informed of certain information; tolling for failure to meet certain obligations; procedure.

It shall be the duty of a probationer, as a condition of probation, to keep his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, informed as to his or her contact information, including residence and mailing address, telephone number, and email address. The court may also require, as a condition of probation and under such terms as the court deems advisable, that the probationer keep his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, informed as to his or her whereabouts.

The running of a probated sentence may be tolled upon the failure of a probationer to appear in court for a probation revocation hearing or to report as directed to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be; either of such failures shall be evidenced by an affidavit from the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, setting forth such failure and stating efforts made by such officer to contact the probationer. When the allegation is for failure to report, such affidavit shall include, at a minimum, an averment by the probation officer or private probation officer that:

The probationer has failed to report to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, on at least two occasions;

The officer has attempted to contact the probationer at least two times by telephone or email at the probationer’s last known telephone number or email address, which information shall be listed in the affidavit;

The officer has checked the local jail rosters and determined that the probationer is not incarcerated;

The officer has sent a letter by first-class mail to the probationer’s last known address, which shall be listed in the affidavit, advising the probationer that the officer will seek a tolling order if the probationer does not report to such officer in person within ten days of the date on which the letter was mailed; and

The probationer has failed to report to the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, as directed in the letter set forth in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph and ten days have passed since the date on which the letter was mailed.

In the event the probationer does not report to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, within the period prescribed in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, such officer shall submit the affidavit required by this subsection to the court. If the probationer reports to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, within the period prescribed in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, such officer shall neither submit such affidavit nor seek a tolling order.

Upon receipt of the affidavit required by subsection (b) of this Code section, the court may, in its discretion, toll the probated sentence.

The effective date of the tolling of the sentence shall be the date the court enters a tolling order and shall continue until the probationer personally reports to the probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, is taken into custody in this state, or is otherwise available to the court, whichever event first occurs. The clerk of court, or judge of any court when there is no clerk of court, shall transmit a copy of a tolling order to the Georgia Crime Information Center within 30 days of the filing of such order.

Any tolled period of time shall not be included in computing creditable time served on probation or as any part of the time that the probationer was sentenced to serve.

Any unpaid fines, restitution, or other moneys owed as a condition of probation shall be due when the probationer is arrested; provided, however, that if the entire balance of his or her probation is revoked, all the conditions of probation, including moneys owed, shall be negated by his or her imprisonment. If only part of the balance of the probation is revoked, the court shall determine the probationer’s responsibility for the amount of the unpaid fines, restitution, and other moneys owed that shall be imposed upon his or her return to probation after release from imprisonment and may reduce arrearages under the same circumstances and conditions as set forth in subsection (f) of Code Section 42-8-102.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, §§
6B-9, 7-6/SB 367; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 2-18/SB 407; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 42/HB 497.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “officer in person” for “officer, either by telephone or in person,” in subparagraph (b)(1)(D) and added the last sentence to subsection (d).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted the present provision of paragraph (b)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “In the event the probationer reports to his or her probation officer or private probation officer, as the case may be, within the period prescribed in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the probationer shall be scheduled to appear on the next available court calendar for a hearing to consider whether the probation sentence should be tolled.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “email” for “e-mail” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (a) and twice in subparagraph (b)(1)(B).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-105 as present Code Section 42-8-109.1.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 63 (2018).

42-8-106.
Advisory committee created; membership.

There is created a judicial advisory committee with respect to the provisions of this article composed of one superior court judge designated by The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, one state court judge designated by The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia, one municipal court judge designated by the Council of Municipal Court Judges of Georgia, one probate court judge designated by The Council of Probate Court Judges of Georgia, one magistrate designated by the Council of Magistrate Court Judges, one attorney who specializes in criminal defense appointed by the Governor, one probation officer appointed by the Governor, and one private probation officer or individual with expertise in private probation services by virtue of his or her training or employment appointed by the Governor. The appointing authority shall determine the length of its appointee’s term serving on such committee. The judicial advisory committee shall provide advice and consultation to the board and DCS on matters relating to this article. The judicial advisory committee shall elect a chairperson from among its membership and such other officers as it deems necessary.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1135, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 8; Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1107, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 692, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 2/SB 44; Code 1981, §

42-8-106

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 3-2/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 7-7/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-101 as present Code Section 42-8-106; and rewrote this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted the subsection (a) designation; substituted “a judicial advisory committee” for “an advisory council” at the beginning of the first sentence; substituted “committee” for “council” at the end of the second sentence; added the third sentence; substituted “The judicial advisory committee” for “The advisory council” at the beginning of the last sentence; and redesignated former subsection (b) as present Code Section 42-8-106.1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “The Council” was substituted for “the Council” three times in the first sentence and “of Georgia” was inserted three times in the first sentence of what is now subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in subsection (b): “No local funds shall be used to implement Sections 1 and 2 of this Act without the consent of the local governing authority.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).